Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Chapter 12. Savings Associations Law
§ 81-12-39.
Capital stock association; statement of compliance; issuance of certificate of authorization; organization meeting.

After approval by the board of the petition for a certificate of incorporation, the proposed capital stock association shall file with the commissioner a statement in such form and with such supporting data and proof as it may require, showing that the entire capital including paid-in surplus has been fully and unconditionally paid in lawful cash money and that the funds representing such capital and paid-in surplus, less sums of the paid-in surplus spent with the approval of the commissioner for land, building, supplies, fixtures, equipment and organization, are on hand and that it has acquired insurance of accounts as provided in this chapter. If the board finds that the capital stock association has in good faith complied with all the requirements of law, it shall, within thirty (30) days after the filing of the said statement issue, in duplicate, under its official seal, a certificate of authorization to transact a general savings and loan business, transmitting one (1) copy to the association and placing one (1) copy in the department file. Said certificate shall state that the association named therein is authorized to transact a general savings and loan business. Should the board find that said statement does not comply with the law, it shall so notify the association and require such compliance as it finds necessary.

Within forty-five (45) days after the corporate existence of an association begins, the directors of the association shall hold an organization meeting for the purpose set forth in Section 81-12-35(5) above, provided the time of such meeting may be similarly extended.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 8(2, 3); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 20; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 21; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 21; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 53; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-41.
Name of association; enjoining violations; penalty.

The name of every association may include either the words “savings association,” or “savings and loan association.” If used, these words shall be preceded by an appropriate descriptive word or words approved by the commissioner. An ordinal number may not be used as a single descriptive word preceding the words “savings association,” or “savings and loan association,” unless such words are followed by the words “of_______________ ,” the blank being filled by the name of the community, town, city or county in which the association has its home office. An ordinal number may be used, together with another descriptive word, preceding the words “savings association” or “savings and loan association,” provided the other descriptive word has not been used in the corporate name of any other association in the state, in which case the suffix mentioned above is not required to be used. An ordinal number may be used, together with another descriptive word, preceding the words “savings association” or “savings and loan association,” even when such other descriptive word has been used in the corporate name of an association in the state, provided the suffix “of_______________ ,” as provided above, is also used. The suffix provided above may be used in any corporate name. The use of the words, “National,” “Federal,” “United States,” “Insured,” “Guaranteed,” or any form thereof, separately or in any combination thereof with other words or syllables, is prohibited as part of the corporate name of an association organized under this chapter. No certificate of incorporation of a proposed association having the same name as a corporation authorized to do business under the laws of this state or a name so nearly resembling it as to be likely to deceive shall be issued by the commissioner, except to an association formed by the reincorporation, reorganization, or consolidation of the association with other associations, or upon the sale of the property or franchise of an association.

No person, firm, company, association, fiduciary, partnership or corporation, either domestic or foreign, unless he or it is lawfully authorized to do business in this state under the provisions of this chapter and actually is engaged in carrying on an association business shall do business under any name or title which contains the terms “savings association,” “savings and loan association,” “building and loan association,” “building association,” or any combination employing either or both of the words “building” or “loan” with one or more of the words “saving,” “savings,” “thrift,” or words of similar import, or any combination employing one or more of the words “saving,” “savings,” “thrift,” or words of similar import with one or more of the words “association,” “institution,” “society,” “company,” “fund,” “corporation,” or words of similar import, or use any name or sign or circulate or use any letterhead, billhead, circular or paper whatever, or advertise or represent in any manner which indicates or reasonably implies that his or its business is the character or kind of business carried on or transacted by an association or which is likely to lead any person to believe that his or its business is that of an association. Upon application by the commissioner or any association, an injunction may issue to restrain any such entity from violating or continuing to violate any of the foregoing provisions of this subsection. Any person who violates any provision of this subsection shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), and each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense. The prohibitions of this subsection shall not apply to any corporation or association formed solely for the purpose of promoting the interests of thrift institutions, the membership of which is comprised of thrift institutions, their officers or other representatives.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 9(1, 2); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 21; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 22; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 22; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 54; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-43.
Change of name or location of home office; hearing.

Without the prior approval of the commissioner or the board, as provided in this chapter, no association shall change its name or establish any office other than its home office, which shall be in the location named in the certificate of incorporation. No office of an association shall be moved unless approved as provided in this chapter.

The name or the location of the home office of any association fixed in the certificate of incorporation may be changed in the following manner:

The proposed new name of the association shall be approved by a resolution adopted by the board of directors. Immediately preceding application to the commissioner for approval, notice of intention to change the name, signed by two (2) officers, shall be published once a week for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the home office is located, and a copy of such notice shall be displayed during such consecutive period of two (2) weeks in a conspicuous public place in the home office of the association. Five (5) copies of an application to the commissioner for approval shall be signed by two (2) officers of the association, acknowledged before an officer competent to take acknowledgments of deeds, and filed with the commissioner. If the application for change of name is approved, the commissioner shall endorse on each copy of the application therefor a certificate of approval thereof, and the change of name of such association shall be effective immediately.

The proposed new location of the association shall be approved by a resolution adopted by the board of directors. Immediately preceding application to the commissioner for approval, notice of intention to change the location of the home office, signed by two (2) officers, shall be published once a week for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the home office is located, and a copy of such notice shall be displayed during such consecutive period of two (2) weeks in a conspicuous public place in the home office of the association. Five (5) copies of an application to the commissioner for approval shall be signed by two (2) officers of the association and acknowledged before an officer competent to take acknowledgments of deeds, and filed with the commissioner.

Whenever the commissioner shall receive from any association pursuant to item (i) of this paragraph (b) an application for change of location of its home office to a municipality other than that in which it is located, he shall make a determination based upon the criteria set out in Section 81-12-27 in the case of establishment of a newly chartered association, and thereafter a hearing shall be held in the manner, within the time and on the notice provided for in Section 81-12-29 and no change of location shall be made without approval of the board.

Whenever the commissioner shall receive from any association pursuant to item (i) of this paragraph (b) an application for change of location of its home office to another location within the same municipality, the commissioner shall prescribe the form of the petition, prerequisites and requirements. If no protests are filed after notice is given as provided in Section 81-12-29(1), the commissioner may approve such application if it meets the established prerequisites and requirements. If protests are filed, the commissioner, upon reasonable notice to the applying association and its attorney and to the protestants and their attorneys, shall hold a hearing and, based upon his written findings at such hearing, issue a certificate of approval or disapproval.

Upon approval of an application for a change of name or home office location, the commissioner shall endorse on each copy of such application a certificate of approval, as provided in this chapter. When the commissioner shall have endorsed such approval upon the copies of an application for approval of change of name or change of location of home office, he shall file one (1) copy thereof with the Secretary of State, two (2) copies with the federal home loan bank of which the association is a member, return one (1) copy to the applicant association and retain the original copy in the permanent files of his office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 9(3, 4); Laws, 1982, chs. 301, § 22; 331, § 4; reenacted, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 23; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 23; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 55; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-45.
Forfeiture of corporate existence; new corporations; extension of time within which to commence business.

Any association which obtains its charter of incorporation subsequent to July 1, 1977, and which shall not commence business within six (6) months after the date upon which its corporate existence shall have begun, shall forfeit its corporate existence, unless the commissioner, before the expiration of such period of six (6) months shall have approved the extension of time within which it may commence business not to exceed ninety (90) days, upon a written application stating the reasons for such delay. Upon such forfeiture the certificate of incorporation shall expire, and all action taken in connection with the incorporation thereof, except the payment of the incorporation fee, shall become void. Amounts credited on savings accounts, less expenditures authorized by law, shall be returned pro rata to the respective holders thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 9(5); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 23; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 24; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 24; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 56; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-47.
Insurance accounts; liquidation of noncomplying existing associations; false representation as to insurance; penalty; injunction.

Each association which obtained its charter of incorporation prior to July 1, 1977, and was organized and engaged in business on July 1, 1977, must submit evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that it has:

Obtained insurance of its savings accounts and share accounts by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or an agency of this state established for the purpose of insuring savings accounts of associations organized under this chapter; or

Become a federal savings and loan association and a member of the federal home loan bank system; or

Merged into, been acquired by, or otherwise consolidated with an existing association whose savings accounts and share accounts are insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation or by some other federal agency or an agency of this state established for the purpose of insuring savings accounts of associations organized under this chapter; provided any merger into, acquisition by or consolidation with an insured association must have prior approval of the board; or

Entered into voluntary or involuntary liquidation.

No charter of incorporation shall be granted or approved by the board after July 1, 1977, unless the applicant for such charter submits sufficient evidence satisfactory to the board that its savings accounts and share accounts are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or an agency of this state established for the purpose of insuring savings accounts of associations organized under this chapter, or will be so insured immediately subsequent to the approval of the charter of incorporation by the board.

No association that obtained its charter prior to July 1, 1977, but which was not organized and engaged in business on July 1, 1977, shall accept deposits unless and until it first complies with subsection (2) of this section, and any additional requirements imposed as to charters granted after July 1, 1977.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, if any association which obtained its charter of incorporation prior to July 1, 1977, and was organized and engaged in business on July 1, 1977, has not accomplished one (1) of the four (4) conditions prescribed in subparagraphs (a), (b), (c) and (d) of subsection (1) on July 1, 1977, the conservator appointed pursuant to Section 81-11-91 shall apply to the chancery court judge designated by the Supreme Court as hereinafter provided for appointment of a liquidating receiver for purposes of liquidating the assets of the association; however, if any such association shall furnish sufficient evidence satisfactory to the conservator appointed pursuant to Section 81-11-91 that a definite plan of accomplishment of one (1) of the four (4) conditions prescribed in subsection (1) has been substantially completed, the conservator appointed pursuant to Section 81-11-91 may extend the time for taking action for the appointment of such receiver, but not beyond March 31, 1978, upon such terms and conditions as the conservator may prescribe. In the absence of a compelling reason to do otherwise, the chancery court judge shall appoint the conservator appointed pursuant to Section 81-11-91 as the liquidating receiver. For the purposes of this subsection, the Supreme Court, upon application of the conservator appointed pursuant to Section 81-11-91, shall designate a chancery court judge who shall, after such designation, have exclusive jurisdiction of all proceedings initiated under this subsection.

No association or officer or employee thereof shall represent in any way that its accounts are insured, unless such accounts are in fact insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or an agency of this state established for the purpose of insuring savings accounts in associations. Any person who shall violate this provision shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished as such. Upon application of the Attorney General to the chancery court of the county in which the association is domiciled, violations of this provision shall be enjoined.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 10; reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 24; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 25; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 25; reenacted and amended, 1994, ch. 622, § 57; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-49.
Powers of associations.

Every association incorporated pursuant to or operating under the provisions of this chapter shall have all the powers enumerated, authorized and permitted by this chapter and such other rights, privileges and powers as may be incidental to or reasonably necessary for the accomplishment of the objects and purposes of this chapter. Every association shall have the following powers:

To be organized for a period not to exceed ninety-nine (99) years, but renewable for additional periods of ninety-nine (99) years in the same manner as the original charter was secured; to adopt and use a corporate seal, which may be affixed by imprint, facsimile or otherwise; and to adopt and amend bylaws as provided in this chapter;

To sue and be sued, complain and defend in any court of law or equity;

To acquire, hold, sell, dispose of and convey real and personal estate incidental to its business as a thrift institution, to mortgage, pledge or lease real or personal estate, and to take property by gifts, devise or bequest, provided that such powers are consistent with the objects and powers granted by this chapter;

An association may accept such savings accounts or other accounts as are authorized by its board of directors and approved by the general regulation of the commissioner not inconsistent with this chapter. The savings deposits may be evidenced by certificates of deposit, passbooks or such other evidence of deposit or account as the board of directors may prescribe. An association may pay interest on its deposits or other accounts from any sources available for such payment at such rate and at such times and for such time or notice periods as are determined by resolution of its board of directors within the limitation set by the commissioner. The board of directors shall determine by resolution the method of calculating the interest on deposits or other accounts and the time when and manner in which interest is to be paid or credited. Such methods shall comply with the regulations issued by the commissioner as to calculation and payment of interest;

An association may borrow up to twenty-five percent (25%) of its savings liability and net worth for lending purposes; an association may borrow an additional twenty-five percent (25%) of its savings liability and net worth for the purpose of making loans guaranteed by the Federal Housing Administration, a private mortgage guaranty insurance company licensed to do business in this state, or by the Veterans Administration; an association may borrow up to fifty percent (50%) of its savings liability and net worth to pay withdrawals. Borrowing of additional amounts for purchase or construction of a home office or branch office is authorized, but only with approval of the commissioner. Subsequent reduction of savings liability and net worth shall not in any way affect outstanding obligations, but shall be reported to the commissioner and steps taken to comply within a reasonable time. The directors may pledge or authorize the officers to pledge any assets of the association to secure any loans herein permitted. For the purpose of this paragraph, use of savings accounts in the association shall not be considered borrowing;

To sell without recourse any loan, including any participating interests therein, at any time; notwithstanding the limitations of this subsection, loans may be assigned for collateral purposes with recourse to any federal home loan bank of which the association is a member;

To obtain and maintain insurance of its savings accounts with the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or an agency of this state established for the purpose of insuring savings accounts of associations organized under this chapter;

To qualify as and become a member of a federal home loan bank;

To appoint officers, agents and employees as its business shall require and to provide them suitable compensation; to provide for life, health and casualty insurance for officers and employees, and to adopt and operate reasonable bonus plans and retirement benefits for such officers and employees; and to provide for reimbursement and indemnification of its officers, employees and directors as prescribed or permitted in this chapter, whether by insurance or otherwise;

To become a member of, deal with or make reasonable payments or contributions to any organization to the extent that such organization assists in furthering or facilitating the association’s purposes, powers or community responsibilities, and to comply with any reasonable conditions of eligibility;

To maintain and let safes, boxes or other receptacles for the safekeeping of personal property upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon;

To sell money orders, travel checks and similar instruments drawn by it on its bank accounts or as agent for any organization empowered to sell such instruments through agents within this state;

If and when an association is a member of a federal home loan bank, to act as fiscal agent of the United States, and, when so designated by the Secretary of the Treasury, to perform, under such regulations as he may prescribe, all such reasonable duties as fiscal agent of the United States as he may require;

To service loans and investments for others;

Upon application to and approval by the commissioner, to act as trustee, and to receive reasonable compensation for so acting, of any trust created or organized in the United States and forming part of a plan which qualifies for specific tax treatment under Section 401(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, including any Keogh or IRA plan, or any trust created or organized in the United States for the purpose of paying burial or cemetery expenses, if the funds of such trust are invested only in savings accounts or deposits in such association or in obligations or securities issued by such association. All funds held in such fiduciary capacity by any such association may be commingled for appropriate purposes of investment, but individual records shall be kept by the fiduciary for each participant and shall show in proper detail all transactions engaged in under the authority of this subsection;

To acquire savings and pay earnings thereon, and to lend and invest its funds as provided in this chapter;

To appoint a registered agent of the association upon whom any process, notice or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the association shall, if such agent is appointed, be served;

To have and possess such of the rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties and obligations of a federal savings and loan association located in this state as may be prescribed by the board by general regulation under the circumstances and conditions set out therein. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this paragraph (r) and any other provision of this chapter, the provisions of this paragraph shall control;

To act as agent for others in any transaction incidental to the operation of the association’s business;

To issue, sell or negotiate or advertise for the issuance and sale of debt securities to the extent authorized by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 11; Laws, 1980, ch. 449, § 2; Laws, 1982, chs. 301, § 25; 467, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 26; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 26; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 58; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-51.
Additional powers of capital stock associations.

A capital stock savings and loan association (hereinafter referred to as a “capital stock association”) shall have the powers enumerated in the preceding section, and shall have the following additional powers:

Capital stock may be issued as follows:

A capital stock association may issue the shares of stock authorized by its articles of incorporation and none other. Capital stock shall have the par value as stated in the articles of incorporation and, with the prior approval of the commissioner, may consist of common stock and preferred stock, which may be divided into classes and classes into series. Each kind, class and series may have such distinguishing characteristics, including designations, preferences, or restrictions as regards dividends, redemption, voting powers or restrictions or qualifications of voting powers as are imposed in the articles of incorporation. Restrictions and qualifications of voting powers so imposed shall control in any case in which any vote or consent of stockholders is now or hereafter required by statute unless such statute shall expressly provide a voting procedure to the contrary.

With the prior approval of the commissioner, shares of preferred or special stock of any class may be divided by number from time to time into, and issued in, designated series. Such shares of preferred or special stock of any class or series thereof shall have such relative rights and preferences with regard to dividend rates, redemption rights, conversion privileges, voting powers and other distinguishing characteristics, as shall be stated and expressed with respect to such class or series, either in the articles of incorporation or in the resolution or resolutions providing for the issue of such stock adopted by the board of directors of the corporation.

Except for stock issued pursuant to a plan of merger, consolidation or conversion from a mutual to a stock association or other type of reorganization which has been approved as provided herein, the consideration for the issuance of voting capital stock, the par value of which shall be maintained as the permanent capital of the association, except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (a)(iv) of this section, shall be paid in cash, and any excess shall be credited to paid-in surplus which shall not be available for dividends or other distribution to stockholders, except upon liquidation.

Except as provided herein, the total of the par values of all outstanding shares of voting capital stock shall be the permanent capital of the association and shall not be retired until final liquidation of the association. Notwithstanding the foregoing limitation, a capital stock association may reduce its permanent capital through a reduction of its outstanding voting capital stock pursuant to a plan adopted by its board of directors, and approved by an affirmative vote of a majority of the shares eligible to vote, and by an affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of those shares present and voting, in person or by proxy, at an annual or special meeting of the stockholders of the association. In the event approval of any such plan for the reduction of stock as herein provided shall result in fractional shares, the association may acquire such fractional shares of its own stock by tender of payment of the price per share prior to such reduction as stipulated in the plan. Such tender may be made by bank check drawn upon association funds payable to the record holders of such fractional shares and mailed United States postage prepaid to such holders at the last address of record with the association. Pursuant to such plan, a capital stock association may purchase or redeem whole shares of its own stock at the price per share stipulated in the plan upon written assent of the holders thereof prior to such reduction. No plan for the reduction of the permanent capital or outstanding voting capital stock of an association shall be effective without first obtaining the written consent of the commissioner.

Unless otherwise provided by the articles of incorporation, every stockholder, upon the sale for cash of any new stock of the same kind, class or series as that which he already holds, shall have the right to purchase his pro rata share thereof, as nearly as may be done without issuance of fractional shares, at the price at which it is offered to others, which price must be in excess of par.

An association shall not make a loan secured by the pledge of its capital stock.

A capital stock association may sell any authorized but unissued shares of capital stock for cash at a price which must be in excess of par. No incentive stock shall be issued. Subject to the requirements of Section 81-12-51(a)(v), an association may employ an agent to sell those shares of authorized capital stock not necessary to meet the minimum capital and paid-in surplus requirements of Section 81-12-37, provided that the proposed agreement with the agent for the sale of such stock is approved by the commissioner before the association enters into such agreement.

No capital stock savings and loan association shall declare or pay any dividend upon its common stock unless such association has received written approval by the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance. Directors declaring a dividend in violation of the provisions of this section shall be personally liable to the full amount of the dividend so declared and it shall be the duty of the commissioner, upon discovering the payment of any such dividend, to forthwith make demand upon the directors that the same be restored to the association, and upon their failure so to do he shall cause suit to be brought against them in the chancery court of the county in which the association is located, either in his name or in the name of the association, to recover the same for the benefit of the association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 12; Laws, 1980, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 1982, chs. 301, § 26; 426, § 2; reenacted, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 27; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 27; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 59; Laws, 1996, ch. 400; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-53.
Conversion of association organized under state law into federal association.

At an annual meeting or at any special meeting of the members called to consider such action, any mutual association as defined in this chapter may convert itself into a federal mutual savings association or federal mutual savings and loan association, hereinafter in this subsection called “federal association,” in accordance with the provisions of the laws of the United States, as now or hereafter amended, upon an affirmative vote of fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the total number of votes of the members eligible to be cast. A copy of the minutes of the proceedings of such meeting of the members, verified by the affidavit of the secretary or an assistant secretary, shall be filed in the office of the commissioner within ten (10) days after the date of such meeting. A sworn copy of the proceedings of such meeting, when so filed, shall be presumptive evidence of the holding and action of such meeting. Any member challenging the accuracy of such minutes by sworn objection may appeal to the commissioner. Within three (3) months after the date of such meeting, the association shall take such action in the manner prescribed and authorized by the laws of the United States as shall make it a federal association. There shall be filed with the commissioner a copy of the charter issued to such federal association by the appropriate federal regulatory authority or a certificate showing the organization of such association as a federal association, certified by the secretary or assistant secretary of the appropriate federal regulatory authority. A similar copy of the charter, or of such certificate, shall be filed by the association with the Secretary of State. No failure to file any such instruments with either the commissioner or the Secretary of State shall affect the validity of such conversion. Upon the grant to any association of a charter by the appropriate federal regulatory authority, the association receiving such charter shall cease to b e an association incorporated under this chapter and shall no longer be subject to the supervision and control of the commissioner. Upon the conversion of any association into a federal association, the corporate existence of such association shall not terminate, but such federal association shall be deemed to be a continuation of the entity of the association so converted and all property of the converted association, including its rights, titles and interests in and to all property of whatever kind, whether real, personal or mixed, and things in action, and every right, privilege, interest and asset then existing, or pertaining to it, or which may inure to it, shall immediately by operation of law and without any conveyance or transfer and without any further act or deed remain and be vested in and continue and be the property of such federal association into which the association has converted itself, and such federal association shall have, hold and enjoy the same in its own right as fully and to the same extent as the same was possessed, held and enjoyed by the converting association, and such federal association, as of the time of the taking effect of such conversion, shall continue to have and succeed to all the rights, obligations and relations of the converting association. All pending actions and other judicial proceedings to which the converting association is a party shall not be deemed to have abated or to have discontinued by reason of such conversion, but may be prosecuted to final judgment, order or decree in the same manner as if such conversion into such federal association had not been made and such federal association resulting from such conversion may continue such action in its corporate name as a federal association, and any judgment, order or decree may be rendered for or against it which might have been rendered for or against the converting association theretofore involved in such judicial proceedings. Any association or corporation which has heretofore converted itself into a federal association under the provisions of the laws of the United States and has received a charter from the appropriate federal regulatory authority shall hereafter be recognized as a federal association, and its federal charter shall be given full recognition by the courts of this state to the same extent as if such conversion had taken place under the provisions of this section; however, there shall have been compliance with the foregoing requirements with respect to the filing with the commissioner of a copy of the federal charter or a certificate showing the organization of such association as a federal association.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 13(1); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301 § 27; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 28; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 28; reenacted and amended, 1994, ch. 622, § 60; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-12-55.
Conversion of federal association into association organized under state law.

At an annual meeting or at any special meeting of the members or stockholders called to consider such action, any federal mutual or capital stock savings association or federal mutual or capital stock savings and loan association, hereinafter in this subsection called “federal association,” may apply for conversion into a state-chartered association under this chapter upon an affirmative vote of fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the total number of votes of the members eligible to be cast or an affirmative vote of sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) or more of all the issued and outstanding stock of such federal association. Upon such affirmative vote, the federal association may apply for a certificate of authority by filing with the commissioner a certificate signed by its president or secretary which sets forth the corporate action herein prescribed and asserts that the institution has complied with the provisions of the laws of the United States. The federal association shall also file with the commissioner the plan of conversion and the proposed amendments to its articles of association as approved by the members or stockholders for the operation of the association as a state-chartered association. Upon receipt of such application, the commissioner shall examine all facts associated with the conversion. The expenses and costs incurred for such special examination shall be paid by the institution applying for permission to convert. The commissioner shall present his findings and recommendations to the State Board of Banking Review for consideration. Upon approval by the State Board of Banking Review, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to the applicant allowing the conversion to proceed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 445, § 13(2); reenacted, 1982, ch. 301, § 28; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 52, § 29; Laws, 1993, ch. 441, § 29; reenacted and amended, 1994, ch. 622, § 61; Laws, 1995, ch. 308, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 496, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 488, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2001.